Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2327
Incorrect location; duty of excavator.

If in the course of excavation the excavator discovers that the operator has incorrectly located the underground facility, he or she shall notify the center as soon as practical but no later than seventy-two hours after discovery.

Laws 1994, LB 421, § 27.